New Jersey, session 222, A2906.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): "Foreign government" means any government other than the government of the United States or of its states, territories, possessions, or any political subdivision thereof that is subject, or military companies of which are subject, to official sanctions of the government of the United States.  "Foreign government" includes an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, acting for a foreign government. "Foreign person" means any individual who is not a citizen of the United States, is not an alien friend as provided in R.S.46:3-18, and is a nonresident alien of the United States or one of its states, territories, or possessions; any corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity created under the laws of a foreign government; or any corporation, partnership, association, or other legal entity, created under the laws of the United States or any of its political subdivisions, the majority of the ownership of which is directly or indirectly held, legally or beneficially, by one or more foreign governments, by one or more foreign persons, by one or more legal entities created under the laws of a foreign government, or by any combination thereof.  "Foreign person" includes an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, acting for a foreign person. "Military facility" means any facility located within the State that is owned or operated by the federal government, and which is used for the purposes of providing logistical, technical, material, training, or any other support to any branch of the United States military. "Protected land" means any parcel of land for which any portion of the parcel is located within 10 miles of a military facility. 2.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no foreign government or foreign person shall acquire, purchase, or otherwise obtain a legal, beneficial, or other interest in any protected land in the State on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.  Any foreign government or foreign person owning or holding an interest in protected land in the State upon the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may continue to own or hold an interest in protected land for a maximum of five years after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and shall not acquire, purchase, or otherwise obtain an interest in, any other protected land, in the State, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), except: (1) pursuant to a process of law involving the collection of debt the execution of a deed in lieu of foreclosure, the forfeiture of a contract for deed, or the imposition of a lien or claim on the land, whether created by a mortgage or otherwise, in which case, the provisions of subsection d. of this section shall apply; or (2) by devise or descent, or through the establishment of a bona fide encumbrance on protected land taken for the purposes of security, in which case, the provisions of subsection f. of this section shall apply. c.  A foreign government or foreign person owning or holding an interest in protected land in the State upon the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall sell or otherwise convey the ownership of, or interest in, the protected land within five years after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The land or interest therein shall be sold or conveyed to an individual, trust, corporation, partnership, or other business entity that is not a foreign government or foreign person subject to the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). d.  (1)  Protected land that is acquired by a foreign government or foreign person, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), pursuant to the exception established in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, shall be sold or conveyed, by the foreign owner thereof, within two years after title to the land is transferred thereto. (2)   Land sold or conveyed in accordance with this subsection shall be sold or conveyed to an individual, trust, corporation, partnership, or other business entity that is not a foreign government or foreign person subject to the provisions of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.     Any provision of this section that is inconsistent with, or in violation of, any treaty between the United States and another country shall not apply to the foreign government or a foreign person of the country that is party to such treaty. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.